Utah statutes.
9-4-803.   Creation of Pamela Atkinson Homeless Trust Account.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund to be known
as the Pamela Atkinson Homeless Trust Account.
(2)  Private contributions received under this section and Section 59-10-1306
shall be deposited into the account to be used only for programs described in
Section 9-4-802.
(3)  Money shall be appropriated from the account to the State Homeless
Coordinating Committee in accordance with the Utah Budgetary Procedures Act.
(4)  The State Homeless Coordinating Committee may accept transfers, grants,
gifts, bequests, or any money made available from any source to implement this
part.
